North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-09.2 Parental Rights and Responsibilities

14-09.2-01.
Parenting coordinator — Definition.

A parenting coordinator is a neutral individual authorized to use any dispute resolution process to resolve disputes between parties arising under a parenting plan or court order. The purpose of a parenting coordinator is to resolve disputes by interpreting, clarifying, and addressing circumstances not specifically addressed by an existing court order. A parenting coordinator:

May assess for the parties whether there has been a violation of an existing court order and, if so, recommend further court proceedings.

May be appointed to resolve a one-time dispute or to provide ongoing dispute resolution services.

Shall attempt to resolve a dispute by facilitating negotiations between the parties to promote settlement and, if it becomes apparent that the dispute cannot be resolved by an agreement of the parties, shall make a decision resolving the dispute.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11; 2021, ch. 116, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 149, S.L. 2009 provides: “

LEGISLATIVE INTENT — FUNDING.

It is the intent of the sixty-first legislative assembly that the parenting coordinator program provided for in section 11 of this Act be self-sustaining and not receive any funding from the general fund after the 2009-11 biennium.”

Section 14 of chapter 149, S.L. 2009 provides: “

EXPIRATION DATE.

Section 11 of this Act is effective through June 30, 2013, and after that date is ineffective.”

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-02.
Appointment of parenting coordinator.

In any action for divorce, legal separation, paternity, or guardianship in which children are involved, the court, upon its own motion or by motion or agreement of the parties, may appoint a parenting coordinator to assist the parties in resolving disputes related to the parenting plan or court order. A party, at any time before the appointment of a parenting coordinator, may file a written objection to the appointment on the basis of domestic violence having been committed by another party against the objecting party or a child who is a subject of the action. After the objection is filed, a parenting coordinator may not be appointed unless, on the request of a party, a hearing is held and the court finds that a preponderance of the evidence does not support the objection. If a parenting coordinator is appointed, the court shall order appropriate measures be taken to ensure the physical and emotional safety of all parties and children.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11; 2021, ch. 116, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-03.
Qualifications.

The supreme court shall establish qualifications and maintain and make available to the public a roster of individuals eligible to serve as a parenting coordinator. The roster must include each individual’s name, address, and telephone number.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-04.
Agreement or decision binding.

Within five days of notice of the appointment, or within five days of notice of a subsequent dispute between the same parties, the parenting coordinator shall meet with the parties together or separately and shall make a diligent effort to facilitate an agreement to resolve the dispute. The parenting coordinator may confer with the parties through a telephone conference or other means. A parenting coordinator may make a decision without conferring with a party if the parenting coordinator makes a good-faith effort to confer with the party. If the parties do not reach an agreement, the parenting coordinator shall make a decision resolving the dispute as soon as possible but not later than five days after receiving all of the information necessary to make a decision and after the final meeting or conference with the parties. The parenting coordinator shall put the agreement or decision in writing and provide a copy to the parties. An agreement of the parties or a written decision of the parenting coordinator is binding on the parties until further order of the court.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11; 2021, ch. 116, § 3, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-05.
Fees.

Before the appointment of the parenting coordinator, the court shall give the parties notice that the fees of the parenting coordinator will be apportioned between the parties. In its order appointing the parenting coordinator, the court shall apportion the fees of the parenting coordinator between the parties, with each party bearing the portion of the fees that the court determines is just and equitable under the circumstances. If a party files a pro se motion regarding a parenting time dispute and there is not a court order that provides for apportionment of the fees of a parenting coordinator, the court may require the party requesting the appointment of a parenting coordinator to pay the fees of the coordinator in advance. Neither party may be required to submit a dispute to a parenting coordinator if the party cannot afford to pay the fees of a parenting coordinator or an affordable coordinator is not available, unless the other party agrees to pay the fees. After the fees are incurred, a party may by motion request that the fees be reapportioned on equitable grounds. The court may consider the resources of the parties, the nature of the dispute, and whether a party acted in bad faith. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 14-09.2-06, the court may consider information from the parenting coordinator in determining bad faith.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-06.
Confidentiality.

If there is an ongoing dispute between the parties regarding a specific written decision of the parenting coordinator, the written decision must be filed with the court and served upon the parties.

Statements made and documents produced as part of the parenting coordinator process, other than the written decision of the parenting coordinator, which are not otherwise discoverable are not subject to discovery or other disclosure and are not admissible into evidence for any purpose at trial or in any other proceeding, including impeachment. Parenting coordinators and lawyers for the parties, to the extent of their participation in the parenting coordinator process, may not be subpoenaed or called as witnesses in court proceedings. Notes, records, and recollections of parenting coordinators are confidential and may not be disclosed unless:

The parties and the parenting coordinator agree in writing to the disclosure; or

Disclosure is required by law or other applicable professional codes. Notes and records of parenting coordinators may not be disclosed to the court unless after a hearing the court determines that the notes or records should be reviewed in camera. Unless the court determines that the notes and records contain information regarding acts that may be a violation of a state or federal criminal law, the notes and records may not be released.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11; 2021, ch. 116, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-07.
Immunity.

A parenting coordinator is immune from civil liability for damages for acts or omissions of ordinary negligence arising out of that individual’s duties and responsibilities as a parenting coordinator.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.

14-09.2-08.
Modification or termination of appointment.

The court may terminate or modify the parenting coordinator appointment upon agreement of the parties, upon motion of either party, at the request of the parenting coordinator, or by the court on its own motion for good cause shown. Good cause includes:

Lack of reasonable progress over a significant period of time despite the best efforts of the parties and the parenting coordinator;

A determination that the parties no longer need the assistance of a parenting coordinator;

Impairment on the part of a party that significantly interferes with the party’s participation in the process; or

The parenting coordinator is unwilling or unable to serve.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 149, § 11.

Note.

Section 1 of ch. 126, S.L. 2013, effective March 27, 2013, repealed section 14 of chapter 149 of the 2009 Session Laws.
This repeal has the effect of eliminating the June 30, 2013 expiration date for N.D.C.C. ch. 14-09.2.